Hawaii, session 2025, GM1103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAW AH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Act 159, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2023 (Act 159), requires the court to
automatically seal or remove from the judiciary's publicly
accessible databases any information relevant to the arrest or
case of a person for whom an expungement order has been entered
and transmitted to the court by July 1, 2025.
The legislature further finds that the court is currently
unable to effectuate Act 159 because the Hawaii criminal justice
data center is not statutorily authorized to release the
expungement orders to the judiciary.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide the
Hawaii criminal justice data center with the statutory authority
to transmit all expungement orders to the judiciary.
SECTION 2. Section 831-3.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (f) to read as follows:
"(f) Every expungement order with a court case number
issued by the attorney general shall be transmitted to the
2025-1287 HB145 HDl HMSO


Page 2 H.B. NO.
judiciary solely for the purposes of this section. The court
shall seal or otherwise remove from the judiciary's publicly
accessible electronic databases all judiciary files and other
information pertaining to the applicable arrest or case of any
person for whom an expungement order listing the court case
number and arrest number associated with the offense has been
entered and transmitted to the court[—]; provided that the
court's duties under this subsection shall not apply to any case
referenced in the expungement order where the person for whom
the order has been entered:
(1) Was charged with multiple offenses at least one of
which is not the subject of the order; or
(2) Is only one of multiple defendants in the case at
least one of whom has not been the subject of a prior
expungement order.
The court shall make good faith diligent efforts to seal or
otherwise remove the applicable files and information within a
reasonable time."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2025-1287 HB145 HDl HMSO 2

Page 3 H.B. NO. 145
H.D. 1
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-1287 HB145 HDl HMSO

H.B. NO. -1
APPROVED this 10th day of April ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 145, HD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: February 27, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: MAR 2 5 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
Senate of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Carol T. Taniguchi
Clerk of the Senate